Illinois, session 104th, HB218.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Professional Limited Liability Company Act 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (805 ILCS 185/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Professional Limited Liability Company Act.9(Source: P.A. 99-227, eff. 8-3-15.)